District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Salary Adjustment Amendment Act of 2026.”
Sec. 2. Section 1109(a-1) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-
611.09(a-1), is amended as follows:
(1) By striking the phrase “January 2, 2023, the Mayor shall receive annual
compensation in the amount of $250,000,” and inserting the phrase “January 2, 2027, the Mayor
shall receive annual compensation in the amount of $290,000,” in its place; and
(2) By striking the phrase “The compensation shall not be subject to step, cost of
living, or other increases” and inserting the phrase “The compensation shall be subject to cost-of-
living increases, but not to step or other increases” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval of the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.